Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-8604
Residential contractor; prohibited
acts.

A residential
contractor shall not promise to rebate any portion of an insurance deductible
as an inducement to the sale of goods or services. A promise to rebate any
portion of an insurance deductible includes granting any allowance or offering
any discount against the fees to be charged or paying an insured or a person
directly or indirectly associated with the residential real estate any form
of compensation, except for any item of nominal value.

Laws 2012, LB943, § 4.